California, session 20252026, AB2204.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3110) is added to Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, to read: CHAPTER 10. The Second Chance Sports Act3110. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Studies have shown that an incarcerated person’s participation in sports is positively correlated with reduced rates of recidivism and negative interventions needed from correctional staff, improving safety at facilities, preserving state resources, and enhancing public safety.(b) Regular participation in sports and physical activities has numerous additional benefits, including increased physical fitness, improved mental health outcomes, and the development of stronger discipline and self-esteem.(c) Sports also provide Participation in sports also provides opportunities for individuals to develop stronger communication skills, learn to navigate conflict and adversity, and create deeper bonds with teammates, other athletes, and their community.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to reduce recidivism and to help individuals more successfully reintegrate into society by requiring the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to create and implement a policy to meaningfully expand access to organized sports programming for incarcerated persons at facilities operated by the department.3111. (a) It is the policy of the State of California that participation in organized sports programming is recognized as a form of rehabilitation.(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall establish a policy on organized sports programming at facilities operated by the department.(2) The policy described in paragraph (1) shall be developed in consultation with researchers and experts in sports and rehabilitation, organizations dedicated to criminal justice reform, athletic organizations, including professional and semi-professional sports teams and leagues, department facility staff, including correctional line staff, and organizations representing incarcerated persons and their families.(3) In developing the policy described in paragraph (1), the department shall consider all of the following:(A) The safety of incarcerated persons, correctional line staff, and other participants.(B) The appropriate use of state resources and facilities by incarcerated persons.(C) Eligibility requirements for participation.(D) Any broader impacts on public safety.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may solicit proposals, accept unsolicited proposals, negotiate, and enter into agreements with public or private entities, including, but not limited to, professional sports teams and leagues, the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and private universities for the purpose of expanding access to organized sports programming at facilities operated by the department.3112. (a) The Second Chance Sports Fund is hereby established within the State Treasury.(b) Moneys deposited into the fund shall be available, upon appropriation and approval by the Government Operations Agency pursuant to subdivision (c), to the department to support the expansion of organized sports programming at facilities operated by the department.(c) The agency shall seek advisement from the Legislature and the department on the priorities for utilizing the moneys made available pursuant to this section and shall approve the uses of the moneys.(d) The fund may receive moneys from any source, including private donations.(e) The moneys in the fund shall supplement, not replace, existing funding for the programming described in this chapter.(f) Not more than 5 percent of the moneys made available pursuant to this section shall be utilized for administrative purposes.(g) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Treasurer shall provide a report to the Legislature on the amounts deposited into the fund.(2) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.